Florida, session 2026, SB1372.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSection 627.42398, Florida Statutes, is created 13 to read: 14 627.42398âCoverage for cancer imaging and genetic testing.â 15 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 16 (a)ââCost-sharing requirementsâ means a deductible, 17 coinsurance, copayment, or similar out-of-pocket expense. 18 (b)ââEvidence-based cancer imagingâ means imaging 19 modalities used in accordance with the most recent version of 20 the National Comprehensive Cancer Network clinical practice 21 guidelines. 22 (c)ââGenetic testing for an inherited mutationâ means 23 germline multi-gene testing for an inherited mutation associated 24 with an increased risk of cancer, which testing is recommended 25 in evidence-based clinical practice guidelines. 26 (2)âA health insurer issuing a health insurance policy, or 27 a health maintenance organization issuing a health maintenance 28 contract, in this state shall provide coverage for all of the 29 following: 30 (a)âGenetic testing for an inherited mutation for an 31 individual with a personal or family history of cancer when such 32 testing is recommended by a licensed health care professional. 33 (b)âEvidence-based cancer imaging for individuals at 34 increased risk of cancer, as recommended by the National 35 Comprehensive Cancer Network clinical practice guidelines. 36 (3)âCoverage required under subsection (2) may not be 37 subject to any cost-sharing requirements. 38 (4)âIf, under federal law, the application of subsection 39 (3) would result in health savings account ineligibility under 40 s. 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, the prohibition under 41 subsection (3) applies only to health savings account qualified 42 high-deductible health plans with respect to the deductible of 43 such a plan after the person has satisfied the minimum 44 deductible under s. 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, except 45 with respect to items or services that are preventive care 46 pursuant to s. 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, in 47 which case the requirements of subsection (3) apply regardless 48 of whether the minimum deductible under s. 223 of the Internal 49 Revenue Code has been satisfied. 50 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.